District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4312

Sale and possession of water-rail or ortolan, reed bird and certain game birds

Repealed.

History

Aug. 23, 1958, 72 Stat. 815, Pub. L. 85-730, § 8(a)-(d)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 22-1608 to 22-1627.